Washington statutes.
RCW 36.39.030

Disposal of remains of indigent persons.

The board of county commissioners of any county shall provide for the disposition of the remains of any indigent person including a recipient of public assistance who dies within the county and whose body is unclaimed by relatives or church organization. The board of county commissioners of any county may provide for the disposition of the remains of an indigent resident of the county who dies in an adjacent county not in Washington state.

[ 2023 c 62 s 1; 1963 c 4 s 36.39.030. Prior: 1953 c 224 s 1; 1951 c 258 s 1.]